Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 32.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-132
Liability for contributions.

(ULLCA 403) (a) A person's
obligation to make a contribution to a limited liability company is not excused
by the person's death, disability, or other inability to perform personally.
If a person does not make a required contribution, the person or the person's
estate is obligated to contribute money equal to the value of the part of
the contribution which has not been made, at the option of the company.

(b) A creditor of a limited
liability company which extends credit or otherwise acts in actual reliance
on an obligation described in subsection (a) of this section may enforce the
obligation.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 32.
January 1, 2011